District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Second Chance Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 16-805(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “prior to the effective date of the
Second Chance Amendment Act of 2022, passed on 2nd reading on December 20, 2022
(Enrolled version of Bill 24-63)” and inserting the phrase “on or before September 30, 2027” in
its place.
(b) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “the effective date of the Second
Chance Amendment Act of 2022, on 2nd reading on December 20, 2022 (Enrolled version of
Bill 24-63), shall be sealed” and inserting the phrase “October 1, 2027, shall be sealed by
October 1, 2027, or” in its place.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of March 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2